North Dakota, session 69, SB2237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 34-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Failure to comply - Disciplinary action - Notice - How served .
1. The labor commissioner shall receive and investigate complaints from a tenant and
take disciplinary action against a landlord upon the failure of the landlord to comply
with sections 47 - 16 - 20 and 47 - 32 - 02, or any rules adopted by the labor commissioner
to enforce sections 47 - 16 - 20 and 47 - 32 - 02 .
2. Before the labor commissioner may take disciplinary action against a landlord for a
violation under this section, the labor commissioner shall notify the landlord in writing
of the reason disciplinary action is being considered and provide a reasonable time for
the landlord to correct the violation.
3. The notice required under subsection 2 must be delivered personally by the labor
commissioner or the commissioner's agent, or sent by registered or certified mail.
4. Any disciplinary action taken against a landlord under this section must comply with
chapter 28 - 32 .
SECTION 2. A new subsection to section 34-05-01.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is
created and enacted as follows:
Receive and investigate complaints from tenants and take disciplinary action against
landlords failing to comply with sections 47 - 16 - 20 and 47 - 32 - 02 .
Page No. 1 25.0577.01000